District of Columbia statutes.
31-5111

Violations.

(a)

In the case of any violation of this chapter by an insurance company, agent, solicitor, or broker, the Commissioner shall have authority to proceed in accordance with the provisions of §§ 31-4305 and 31-4326 [repealed] and §§ 31-2502.03 and 31-2502.36 [repealed].

(b)

In the case of any violation of this chapter by a creditor or by any other person not licensed in the District as an insurance agent, solicitor, or broker, regardless of the fact that such creditor or other person is not required by law to be so licensed, the penalties and the procedure for their imposition shall be as set forth in § 31-2502.42.

Sept. 25, 1962, 76 Stat. 584, Pub. L. 87-686, § 11
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10(m), 44 DCR 1730
Department of Insurance abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 31-5102.
1973 Ed., § 35-1611.
1981 Ed., § 35-1011.